Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB697.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 199 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 1 to 3 of this Act:
(1) "Altruistic surrogacy" means any contract, agreement, or other arrangement in
Page 1 of 8
XXXX 2/23/2026 2:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1349
which a woman agrees to become pregnant or carry and deliver a child for
another person or persons without compensation;
(2) "Commercial surrogacy" means any contract, agreement, or other arrangement
in which a woman agrees to become pregnant or carry and deliver a child for
another person or persons in exchange for compensation;
(3) "Compensation":
(a) Means a payment of money, objects, services, or anything else having
monetary value; and
(b) Does not include reimbursement or payment of actual expenses incurred
that are directly related to the pregnancy including reasonable charges and
fees for:
1. Hospital or medical services for the birth of the child;
2. Medical care, including prenatal care, and other reasonable birth-
related expenses for the mother or child; or
3. Payment of a judicially sanctioned settlement or judgment rendered in
favor of the woman or her heirs as a result of her death, loss of
reproductive organs or capability, or any other health complications
caused by in utero embryo transfer, pregnancy, or resulting childbirth,
miscarriage, or termination of pregnancy; and
(4) "In utero embryo transfer" means the medical procedure in which an embryo is
transferred into the uterus of a woman.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 199 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) It shall be unlawful for any person, corporation, association, agency, institution,
intermediary, or organization to:
(a) Operate, facilitate, advertise, broker, or arrange commercial surrogacy
services, or enter into a commercial surrogacy agreement within this
Page 2 of 8
XXXX 2/23/2026 2:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1349
Commonwealth or with a resident of this Commonwealth;
(b) Solicit, recruit, or induce a resident of this Commonwealth to participate in
commercial surrogacy or enter into a commercial surrogacy agreement;
(c) Attempt to enforce a commercial surrogacy agreement to which a resident
of this Commonwealth is a party; or
(d) Conduct business in this Commonwealth, electronically or otherwise, for
the purpose of facilitating commercial surrogacy in this Commonwealth.
(2) This section shall not apply to:
(a) An altruistic surrogacy;
(b) A woman acting as a surrogate; or
(c) A child born as a result of a prohibited commercial surrogacy arrangement.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 199 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Any commercial surrogacy contract, agreement, or other arrangement entered into by
a resident of this Commonwealth shall be void and unenforceable as against public
policy whether executed in this Commonwealth or any other state or territory of the
United States.
Section 4. KRS 199.590 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) A person, corporation, or association shall not advertise in any manner that it
will receive children for the purpose of adoption.
(b) A newspaper published in the Commonwealth of Kentucky or any other
publication which is prepared, sold, or distributed in the Commonwealth of
Kentucky shall not contain an advertisement that[which] solicits children for
adoption or solicits the custody of children.
(2) (a) A person, agency, institution, or intermediary shall not sell,[ or] purchase, or
procure for sale or purchase, any child for the purpose of adoption or any
other purpose, including termination of parental rights.
Page 3 of 8
XXXX 2/23/2026 2:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1349
(b) This section shall not:
1. Prohibit a child-placing agency from charging a fee for adoption
services; or[. This section shall not ]
2. Be construed to prohibit in vitro fertilization.
(c) As used in[For purposes of] this section, "in vitro fertilization" means the
process by which an egg is removed from a woman, and fertilized in a
receptacle by the sperm of the husband of the woman in whose womb the
fertilized egg will [thereafter ]be implanted.
(3) (a) A[No] person, association, or organization, other than the cabinet or a child-
placing institution or agency, shall not place a child or act as intermediary in
the placement of a child for adoption or otherwise, except in the home of a
stepparent, grandparent, sister, brother, aunt, or uncle, or upon written
approval of the secretary.
(b) This subsection shall not be construed to:
1. Limit the cabinet[ for Health and Family Services] in carrying out its
public assistance under Title IV-A of the Federal Social Security Act
program in accordance with KRS Chapter 205; or[. This section shall
not be construed to ]
2. Prohibit private independent adoption or the right to seek legal services
relating to a private independent adoption.
(4) (a) A person, agency, institution, or intermediary shall not:
1. Be a party to a contract or agreement which would compensate a woman
for her artificial insemination and subsequent termination of parental
rights to a child born as a result of that artificial insemination for the
purpose of adoption; or[. A person, agency, institution, or intermediary
shall not ]
2. Receive compensation for the facilitation of contracts or agreements as
Page 4 of 8
XXXX 2/23/2026 2:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1349
proscribed by this subsection.
(b) Contracts or agreements entered into in violation of this subsection shall be
void.
(5) (a) A person, organization, group, agency, or any legal entity, except a child-
placing agency, shall not accept any fee for bringing the adoptive parents
together with the child to be adopted or the biological parents of the child to
be adopted.
(b) This section shall not interfere with the legitimate practice of law by an
attorney.
(6) (a) In every adoption proceeding, the expenses paid, including but not limited to
any fees for legal services, placement services, and expenses of the biological
parent or parents, by the prospective adoptive parents for any purpose related
to the adoption shall be submitted to the court and[,] supported by an
affidavit, setting forth in detail a listing of expenses for the court's approval or
modification.
(b) In the event the court modifies the expense request as it relates to legal fees
and legal expenses only, the attorney for the adoptive parents shall not have
any claim against the adoptive parents for the amount not approved.
Section 5. KRS 199.990 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS 199.430, 199.470,
199.473, 199.570, 199.572,[ and] 199.590 except subsections[subsection] (2)
and (4), or 199.640 to 199.670, or any[ rule or] regulation under those[such]
sections, the violation of which is made unlawful, shall be fined not less than
five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) or
imprisoned for not more than six (6) months, or both; and[.]
(b) Each day the[such] violation continues shall constitute a separate offense.
(2) Any person who willfully violates any other provision[of the provisions] of KRS
Page 5 of 8
XXXX 2/23/2026 2:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1349
199.420 to 199.670, or any[ rule or] regulation under those sections[thereunder],
the violation of which is made unlawful under the terms of those sections, and for
which no other penalty is prescribed in those sections[,] or in any other applicable
statute, shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than two
hundred dollars ($200) or imprisoned for not more than thirty (30) days, or both.
(3) (a) 1. Any violation of the regulations, standards, or requirements of the
cabinet under[ the provisions of] KRS 199.896 that poses an immediate
threat to the health, safety, or welfare of any child served by the child-
care center shall be subject to a civil penalty of not[no] more than one
thousand dollars ($1,000) for each occurrence; and[. ]
2. Treble penalties shall be assessed for two (2) or more violations within
twelve (12) months.
(b) 1. All money collected as a result of civil penalties assessed under[ the
provisions of] KRS 199.896 shall be paid into the State Treasury and
credited to a special fund for the purpose of the Early Childhood
Scholarship Program created in accordance with KRS 164.518; and[.]
2. The balance of the fund shall not lapse to the general fund at the end of
each biennium.
(4) A person who commits a violation of the regulations, standards, or requirements of
the cabinet under[ the provisions of] KRS 199.896 shall be fined not less than one
thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisoned for not more than twelve (12) months, or
be fined and imprisoned[,] at the discretion of the court.
(5) Any person who violates[ any of the provisions of] KRS 199.590(2) or (4) shall be
guilty of a Class D felony.
(6) Any person who knowingly or intentionally registers false information under KRS
199.503(4) shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or
imprisoned for not more than twelve (12) months, or be fined and imprisoned[,] at
Page 6 of 8
XXXX 2/23/2026 2:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1349
the discretion of the court.
(7) Any person who knowingly or intentionally releases or requests confidential
information in violation of KRS 199.503(8) or (9) or in violation of KRS 199.505
shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisoned for not
more than twelve (12) months, or be fined and imprisoned[,] at the discretion of the
court. It is a defense under this subsection if the cabinet releases confidential
information while acting in good faith and with reasonable diligence.
(8) (a) Any person who intentionally registers false information under KRS 199.881
to 199.888 with the cabinet in pursuit of the benefits of this program shall be
subject to a civil penalty of not[no] more than five hundred dollars ($500) per
violation; and[.]
(b) All money collected as a result of penalties assessed under KRS 199.881 to
199.888 shall be paid into the State Treasury and credited to the Employee
Child Care Assistance Partnership fund.
(9) (a) Any person, corporation, association, agency, institution, intermediary, or
organization who violates subsection (1) of Section 2 of this Act shall be
guilty of a Class D felony for the first offense and a Class C felony for the
second and each subsequent offense.
(b) In addition to any criminal penalty imposed under paragraph (a) of this
subsection, any person, corporation, association, agency, institution,
intermediary, or organization who violates subsection (1) of Section 2 of
this Act shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed the sum of ten
thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation. When the violation is of a
continuing nature, each day upon which a violation occurs shall be deemed
a separate offense.
(c) A conviction of a corporation, association, agency, institution, intermediary,
or organization of violating subsection (1) of Section 2 of this Act shall
Page 7 of 8
XXXX 2/23/2026 2:20 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1349
operate to forfeit its charter or right to do business in this Commonwealth.
(d) The Attorney General may initiate proceedings in any Circuit Court in this
Commonwealth to enforce the provisions of paragraph (b) of this subsection
and to enjoin further violations. It shall not be required that actual damages
be alleged or proved to recover injunctive relief or attorney's fees and costs.
(e) This subsection shall not be construed to limit or restrict the powers, duties,
remedies, or penalties available to the Attorney General, the
Commonwealth, or any other person under any other statutory authority or
common law.
Section 6. If any provision of this Act or the application thereof to any person
or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or
applications of the Act that can be given effect without the invalid provision or
application, and to this end the provisions of this Act are severable.
Section 7. The penalties under Section 5 of this Act shall apply to all contracts
or agreements entered into on or after the effective date of this Act.
Page 8 of 8
XXXX 2/23/2026 2:20 PM Jacketed